Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 4. Retail Licenses.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.200.
Beverage dispensary license.

A beverage dispensary license authorizes the holder to sell or serve on the licensed premises alcoholic beverages for consumption only on the licensed premises.

The biennial beverage dispensary license fee is $2,500.

The holder of a beverage dispensary license may not maintain on the licensed premises more than one room in which there is regularly maintained a fixed counter or service bar that has plumbing connections to permanent plumbing at which alcoholic beverages are sold or served to members of the public for consumption, unless the license has a multiple fixed counter endorsement under AS

04.09.420

.

Except as provided under AS

04.09.610

,

04.09.640

,

04.09.670

, and AS

04.16.120(c)

, the holder of a beverage dispensary license who sells or serves alcoholic beverages off the licensed premises or permits consumption off the premises of alcoholic beverages sold or served on the premises commits the offense of unauthorized beverage dispensary activity.

Unauthorized beverage dispensary activity is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.210.
Restaurant or eating place license.

A restaurant or eating place license authorizes a restaurant or eating place to

sell brewed beverages and wine for consumption only on the licensed premises; and

allow a person

under 21 years of age access as provided in (d) of this section to the licensed premises; and

to enter or remain on the licensed premises to consume food or nonalcoholic beverages as authorized under AS 04.16.010(c)(5).

The biennial restaurant or eating place license fee is $1,250.

The board may issue or renew a license under this section only if the

board determines that

the licensed premises is a bona fide restaurant as defined in AS

04.21.080(b)

;

there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably ensure that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages; and

it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not employed on the premises will enter and remain on the licensed premises for purposes other than dining; and

sale and service of food and alcoholic beverages and any other business conducted on the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is under the sole control of the licensee.

The board may authorize the holder of a restaurant or eating place license

to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only;

to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only if

the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of age or older; and

the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person being on the licensed premises; and

subject to AS

04.16.049

, to employ or permit the employment of a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the licensed premises if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that the person does not obtain alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a restaurant or eating place license shall ensure that gross receipts from the sale of food for consumption on the licensed premises are not less than the total of the gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises in each calendar year. At the time the holder submits an application for renewal of the license, the holder shall submit a statement to the board certifying that the holder has met the requirement under this subsection for the designated period of the license under AS

04.11.680

. The board may renew a restaurant or eating place license only if the licensee’s statement provides evidence satisfactory to the board that, during the designated period of the license under AS

04.11.680

, the gross receipts from the sale of food for consumption on the licensed premises were not less than the total of the gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises.

The holder of a restaurant or eating place license may provide entertainment on or adjacent to the licensed premises only between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. unless additional hours are approved by the director upon the written request of the licensee for a specific occasion. The director may not grant approval for additional hours of entertainment on or adjacent to the licensed premises of an individual licensee more than six times in a calendar year. In this subsection, “entertainment” includes dancing, karaoke, live performances, or similar activities, but does not include recorded or broadcast performances without live participation.

Except as provided under AS

04.09.620

,

04.09.640

,

04.09.645

, and AS

04.16.120(c)

, the holder of a restaurant or eating place license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a restaurant or eating place license if the person sells brewed beverages or wine in violation of (a) of this section, engages in activity not authorized by the board under (d) of this section, or fails to comply with the requirements of (d), (e), or (f) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a restaurant or eating place license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.220.
Club license.

A club license authorizes a club or organization to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption only on the licensed premises.

The biennial fee for a club license is $1,500.

The board may issue a club license only to an organization operated for social, recreational, benevolent, or athletic purposes and not for profit. The board may issue a club license only to a club, fraternal organization, patriotic organization, or social organization that has been chartered by

a state or national organization for a period of 10 consecutive years before application for a license under this section; or

a national organization that has maintained a chartered club or organization in the state for a period of at least 20 years.

Alcoholic beverages sold under a club license may be purchased only by

members of the club and their families;

widows or widowers of deceased members of the club who have been accorded club privileges; and

military personnel on active duty who are extended the privilege by patriotic organizations.

Alcoholic beverages may be purchased only in the portion of the club rooms that are part of the licensed premises.

Guests who enter the club premises on the invitation of a member and in the company of the member may be served but not sold alcoholic beverages. A guest shall leave the premises immediately upon the departure of the member who extended the invitation to enter.

Notwithstanding AS

04.16.049

, access by persons under 21 years of age to the

licensed premises of a club is permitted when alcoholic beverages are not present; and

premises of a patriotic organization licensed as a club under this section is permitted when alcoholic beverages are present, if the person possesses a valid active duty military or armed forces identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Homeland Security.

The holder of a club license may not serve or sell alcoholic beverages for use or consumption off the licensed premises of the club or organization, including use or consumption by a club member or employee, except under a club caterer’s permit.

The holder of a club license may not

solicit public patronage of the club premises, except as approved by he board;

distribute income from the sale of alcoholic beverages under the license to a member, director, or officer;

sell or serve alcoholic beverages in club rooms outside the portion of the club rooms that are part of the licensed premises.

In this section, “member” means a holder of a full year of paid membership entitling the holder to all voting rights and privileges of membership under the constitution or bylaws of the club or organization.

The holder of a club license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a club license if the person sells alcoholic beverages in violation of (a) of this section or violates (d), (e), (f), (h), or (i) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a club license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.230.
Package store license.

A package store license authorizes the holder to operate a package store to store alcoholic beverages with federally compliant labels and to sell alcoholic beverages with federally compliant labels to a person present on the licensed premises.

The biennial package store license fee is $1,500.

The licensed premises occupied by the holder of a package store license may not be connected by a door, opening, or other means of passage intended for the access of the general public to an adjacent retail business not licensed under this title unless approved by the board.

If the holder of a package store license also holds a beverage dispensary license, the licensed premises of the package store are contained within or are adjacent to the licensed premises of the beverage dispensary, and the only public entrance to the package store is by a door or other means within the beverage dispensary, the board shall determine whether additional entrances to the package store are necessary for enforcement purposes, to meet health and fire safety standards, or for the convenience of the public.

The holder of a package store license may not

offer alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises or allow the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises except as authorized by a package store sampling endorsement issued under AS

04.09.490

or a package store tasting event permit issued under AS

04.09.670

;

subdivide alcoholic beverages except as authorized by a package store repackaging endorsement issued under AS

04.09.480

;

offer alcoholic beverages for sale or sell alcoholic beverages to a person not present on the licensed premises who makes an order for shipment except as authorized by a package store shipping endorsement under AS

04.09.460

; or

deliver alcoholic beverages to a person not present on the licensed premises except as authorized by a package store delivery endorsement under AS

04.09.470

.

The holder of a package store license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a package store license if the person stores or sells alcoholic beverages in violation of (a) of this section or fails to comply with (c) or (e) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a package store license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.240.
Pub license.

A pub license authorizes the holder to sell brewed beverages and wine for consumption only at a designated premises located on the campus of an accredited college or university.

The biennial pub license fee is $1,250.

The board may not

issue more than one pub license for each accredited college or university campus in the state; and

issue or renew a pub license without the written approval of the governing body of the accredited college or university.

The board may designate two alternating premises for a pub license if

both premises are

located on the accredited college or university campus;

not located in contiguous rooms or adjacent buildings; and

under the licensee’s control;

at any time, only one location is operating as a licensed premises with specified operating hours approved by the board; and

all alcoholic beverages are either removed from the alternate premises or stored in a secure location that is not accessible to the general public during times when the alternate premises is not operating as a licensed premises.

The board may suspend or revoke a licensee’s use of an alternate premises under (d) of this section after providing to the licensee written notice and an opportunity to be heard.

In this section, “accredited college or university” means a college or university accredited by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.

The holder of a pub license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a pub license if the person sells brewed beverages or wine in violation of (a) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a pub license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.250.
Theater license.

A theater license authorizes the holder of a beverage dispensary license or a restaurant or eating place license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on licensed premises at a specified theater site, except that a restaurant or eating place licensee with a theater license may only sell brewed beverages and wine.

The biennial theater license fee is $1,250.

The holder of a theater license may sell or serve alcoholic beverages only in designated areas on the licensed premises and only for one hour before the event and during intermissions.

The holder of a theater license may not sell, serve, or permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages in the audience viewing area.

The holder of a theater license shall post the license conspicuously in the theater during times when alcoholic beverages are sold.

The board may not approve an application for transfer of a theater license to another location.

In this section, “theater” means a location where events, including plays, operas, orchestra concerts, readings, and similar activities as determined by the board, are presented by live performers on a stage.

A person commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a theater license if the person sells, serves, or permits the consumption of alcoholic beverages except as permitted in this section or fails to post the license as required by this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a theater license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.260.
Common carrier dispensary license.

A common carrier dispensary license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption aboard a boat or train licensed by a state or federal agency for passenger travel, or aboard an aircraft operated by an airline licensed by a state or federal agency for passenger travel.

Except as provided for airlines under (c) of this section, the biennial common carrier dispensary license fee is $1,000 for each of the first 10 licenses a common carrier holds and $100 for each additional license issued to the common carrier after the first 10 licenses.

The biennial fee for a common carrier dispensary license issued to an airline is the fee specified under (b) of this section for each aircraft in which alcoholic beverages are served or $2,000 for each community served by the airline. An airline shall specify the fee applicable to the license at the time of the airline’s application for issuance or renewal of the license.

Except for a common carrier that is an airline, a common carrier shall obtain a license for each boat or train in which alcoholic beverages are served. After obtaining an initial license for the first boat or train, the common carrier may obtain additional licenses for additional boats or trains upon making a written request identifying the boat or train in the manner prescribed by the board and paying the biennial fee for additional licensed premises as required by (b) of this section.

The holder of a common carrier dispensary license who exceeds the authority granted in (a) of this section commits the crime of unauthorized common carrier dispensary activity.

Unauthorized common carrier dispensary activity is a class A misdemeanor.

The holder of a common carrier dispensary license who fails to comply with (b) — (d) of this section commits the offense of common carrier dispensary noncompliance.

Common carrier dispensary noncompliance is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500 for each boat, train, or aircraft not in compliance with this section.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.270.
Sporting activity or event license.

A sporting activity or event license authorizes the holder to sell brewed beverages and wine at multiple noncontiguous locations at a sporting activity or event site during and one hour before and after a sporting activity or event that is not a school activity or event, for consumption on designated areas at the sporting activity or event site.

The biennial sporting activity or event license fee is $1,250.

In this section, “sporting activity or event site” includes a location where baseball, hockey, rugby, soccer, or football games, car races, dog sled racing events, rodeos, skiing and snowboarding activities, bowling games or leagues, or curling matches are regularly held.

The holder of a sporting activity or event license who sells brewed beverages or wine off the licensed premises or during hours not authorized under (a) of this section or who permits consumption off the premises of brewed beverages or wine sold on the premises commits the offense of unauthorized sporting activity or event activity.

Unauthorized sporting activity or event activity is a violation.

The holder, on the day before the effective date of this section, of a recreational site license issued under former AS

04.11.210

who offered brewed beverages and wine for sale to the public for consumption on the licensed premises may continue to offer brewed beverages and wine for sale to the public for consumption on the premises until December 31, 2027, for a license renewing on an odd-numbered year, or December 31, 2028, for a license renewing on an even- numbered year, if the holder of the license is otherwise in compliance with the requirements of this title as it read on the day before the effective date of this section.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.280.
Outdoor recreation lodge license.

An outdoor recreation lodge license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages to a registered overnight guest or off-duty staff of the lodge for consumption on the licensed premises or in conjunction with purchased outdoor recreation activities provided by the licensee.

The biennial outdoor recreation lodge license fee is $2,500.

The board may not grant an application for transfer of an outdoor recreation lodge license to another location.

In this section, “outdoor recreation lodge” means a licensed business that provides overnight accommodations and meals, is primarily involved in offering opportunities for persons to engage in outdoor recreation activities, and has a minimum of two guest rooms.

The holder of an outdoor recreation lodge license who sells alcoholic beverages in violation of the authority granted under (a) of this section commits the offense of unauthorized outdoor recreation lodge activity.

Unauthorized outdoor recreation lodge activity is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.290.
Fair license.

A fair license authorizes the holder to sell beer and wine at multiple noncontiguous locations at an annual fair held on fairgrounds for consumption on the licensed premises.

The biennial fair license fee is $1,250.

The board may issue a fair license only to a nonprofit organization that is incorporated under AS 10.20 and has been active for a period of at least five years before the effective date of sec. 13 of this Act.

The holder of a fair license may not sell brewed beverages or wine at more than 30 events, other than an annual fair, held on the fairgrounds in a calendar year.

In this section, “annual fair” means an annual gathering of residents of all or a portion of the state that offers competitive exhibitions of livestock and agricultural crops, carnival amusement rides and games, and displays of arts and crafts.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.300.
Golf course license.

A golf course license authorizes the holder to sell brewed beverages and wine for consumption on the licensed premises.

The biennial golf course license fee is $1,250.

An application for a golf course license must include

a drawing of the golf course with an annotated illustration and description of the portions of the course that are intended to be licensed premises; and

a sample food menu.

The board may not approve an application for transfer of a golf course license to another location.

The holder of a golf course license shall make food similar to that listed in the sample menu available during times when brewed beverages and wine are sold, served, and consumed on the licensed premises.

The holder of a golf course license may not allow a person other than the holder or an agent or employee of the holder, in the regular course of employment, to bring alcoholic beverages onto the licensed premises or other portions of the course for consumption.

In this section, “licensed premises” includes the golf course, a driving range, a club house, and other buildings located on the course, and a vending cart carrying beverages or food to, from, or on the course, and does not include the parking lot.

The holder of a golf course license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a golf course license if the person sells brewed beverages or wine in violation of this section or violates (e) or (f) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a golf course license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.310.
Destination resort license.

A destination resort license authorizes the holder to sell alcoholic beverages at multiple noncontiguous locations at a destination resort for consumption on the licensed premises in conjunction with the visitor activities provided by the licensee to cruise ship passengers and staff and other visitors while the cruise ship is in port at the resort.

The biennial destination resort license fee is $2,500.

The board may not approve an application for transfer of a destination resort license to another location.

In this section, “destination resort” means a business that owns a site of at least 20 acres that is used principally as a destination for cruise ships and other vessels that carry a minimum of 50 passengers and that does not provide overnight lodging on its premises for visitors.

The holder of a destination resort license commits the offense of failure to comply with a destination resort license if the person sells alcoholic beverages in violation of (a) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a destination resort license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.320.
Brewery retail license.

A brewery retail license authorizes the holder to store, sell, or serve on the licensed premises brewed beverages for consumption on and off the premises.

The biennial brewery retail license fee is $1,250.

The board may issue a brewery retail license only to the holder of a brewery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.020

. The brewery retail licensed premises may be all or part of the brewery manufacturer licensed premises, or the brewery retail licensed premises may be at a single different site that is adjacent to the brewery manufacturer licensed premises.

Each day, the holder of a brewery retail license may sell, to a person on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises, not more than

36 ounces of the holder’s beer; or

18 ounces of the holder’s sake.

Except as provided under (g) of this section and AS

04.09.685

, the holder of a brewery retail license may not

allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the premises where the consumption occurs;

provide seats at the counter or bar where the brewed beverages are served;

open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or

serve brewed beverages after 9:00 p.m.

Each day, the holder of a brewery retail license is authorized to sell, to a person on the licensed premises for consumption off the licensed premises, not more than 5.167 gallons of the holder’s beer or sake.

The holder of a brewery retail license may allow on the premises where the consumption occurs

activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other displays that directly promote or educate customers about the brewery’s products, processes, or establishment; and

other community organizations or businesses to provide presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers.

The holder of a brewery retail license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a brewery retail license if the person stores, sells, or serves brewed beverages in violation of (a) of this section or violates (d), (e), or (f) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a brewery retail license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.330.
Winery retail license.

A winery retail license authorizes the holder to store, sell, or serve on the licensed premises wine for consumption on and off the premises.

The biennial winery retail license fee is $1,000.

The board may issue a winery retail license only to the holder of a winery manufacturer license issued under AS

04.09.030

. The winery retail licensed premises may be all or part of the winery manufacturer licensed premises, or the winery retail licensed premises may be at a single different site that is adjacent to the winery manufacturer licensed premises.

Each day, the holder of a winery retail license may sell, to a person on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises, a total volume that does not exceed

18 ounces of the holder’s wine, mead, or cider containing 8.5 percent or more alcohol by volume;

36 ounces of the holder’s mead or cider containing less than 8.5 percent alcohol by volume; or

the alcoholic equivalent of (1) or (2) of this subsection.

Except as provided under (g) of this section and AS

04.09.685

, the holder of a winery retail license may not

allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the premises where the consumption occurs;

provide seats at the counter or bar where the wine is served;

open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or

serve wine after 9:00 p.m.

Each day, the holder of a winery retail license is authorized to sell, to a person on the licensed premises for consumption off the licensed premises, not more than 5.167 gallons of the holder’s wine, mead, or cider.

The holder of a winery retail license may allow on the premises where the consumption occurs

activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other displays that directly promote or educate customers about the winery’s products, processes, or establishment; and

other community organizations or businesses to provide presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers.

The holder of a winery retail license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a winery retail license if the person stores, sells, or serves wine in violation of (a) of this section or violates (d), (e), or (f) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a winery retail license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.340.
Distillery retail license.

A distillery retail license authorizes the holder to store, sell, or serve on the licensed premises distilled spirits for consumption on and off the premises.

The biennial distillery retail license fee is $1,250.

The board may issue a distillery retail license only to the holder of a distillery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.040

. The distillery retail licensed premises may be all or part of the distillery manufacturer licensed premises, or the distillery retail licensed premises may be at a single different site that is adjacent to the distillery manufacturer licensed premises.

The holder of a distillery retail license may sell not more than three ounces of the holder’s distilled spirits each day to a person on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises. The holder of a distillery retail license may combine the holder’s distilled spirits under this subsection with other ingredients that are not alcoholic beverages, including mixers, liquids, and garnishes.

Except as provided under (g) of this section and AS

04.09.685

, the holder of a distillery retail license may not

allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the premises where the consumption occurs;

provide seats at the counter or bar where the distilled spirits are served;

open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or

serve distilled spirits after 9:00 p.m.

The holder of a distillery retail license is authorized to sell not more than 3.75 liters of the holder’s distilled spirits each day to a person on the licensed premises for consumption off the licensed premises.

The holder of a distillery retail license may allow on the premises where the consumption occurs

activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other displays that directly promote or educate customers about the distillery’s products, processes, or establishment; and

other community organizations or businesses to provide presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers.

The holder of a distillery retail license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a distillery retail license if the person stores, sells, or serves distilled spirits in violation of (a) of this section or violates (d), (e), or (f) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a distillery retail license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.350.
Beverage dispensary tourism license.

A beverage dispensary tourism license authorizes the holder to sell or serve on the licensed premises alcoholic beverages for consumption only on the licensed premises.

The biennial beverage dispensary tourism license fee is $2,500.

The board may

issue a new beverage dispensary tourism license if it appears that the issuance will encourage the tourist trade by promoting the construction or improvement of

a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business relating to the tourist trade with a dining facility or having kitchen facilities in a majority of its rental rooms and at least a minimum number of rental rooms required according to the population of the incorporated city, unified municipality, or population area established under AS

04.11.400(a)

in which the facility will be located, as follows:

10 rental rooms if the population is less than 1,501;

20 rental rooms if the population is 1,501 — 2,500;

25 rental rooms if the population is 2,501 — 5,000;

30 rental rooms if the population is 5,001 — 15,000;

35 rental rooms if the population is 15,001 — 25,000;

40 rental rooms if the population is 25,001 — 50,000; and

50 rental rooms if the population is greater than 50,000; or

an airport terminal; and

approve the renewal or transfer of ownership of a beverage dispensary tourism license initially issued under (1) of this subsection or initially issued as a beverage dispensary license under AS

04.11.400

, as that section read on the date of the initial licensure, if the

holder of the license operates a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business relating to the tourist trade that

has a dining facility on the licensed premises or kitchen facilities in a majority of its rental rooms; and

maintains at least the minimum number of rental rooms that the hotel, motel, resort, or similar business had at the time of initial licensure or that were required at the time of initial licensure; or

licensed premises are located inside an airport terminal.

The holder of a beverage dispensary tourism license may not maintain on the licensed premises more than one room in which there is regularly maintained a fixed counter or service bar that has plumbing connections to permanent plumbing at which alcoholic beverages are sold or served to members of the public for consumption unless the license has a multiple fixed counter endorsement under AS

04.09.420

, a hotel or motel endorsement under AS

04.09.430

, or a large resort endorsement under AS

04.09.440

.

Except as provided under AS

04.09.610

,

04.09.640

,

04.09.670

, and AS

04.16.120(c)

, the holder of a beverage dispensary tourism license who sells or serves alcoholic beverages off the licensed premises or permits consumption off the premises of alcoholic beverages sold or served on the premises commits the offense of unauthorized beverage dispensary tourism activity.

Unauthorized beverage dispensary tourism activity is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.360.
Seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license.

A seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license authorizes a restaurant or eating place to

sell brewed beverages and wine for consumption only on the licensed premises for a period not to exceed six months in each calendar year; and

allow a person

under 21 years of age access as provided in (f) of this section to the licensed premises; and

to enter or remain on the licensed premises to consume food or nonalcoholic beverages as authorized under AS 04.16.010(c)(5).

The biennial seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license fee is $1,250.00

The board may issue or renew a license under this section only if

the board determines that

the licensed premises is a bona fide restaurant as defined in AS

04.21.080(b)

;

there is supervision on the premises adequate to reasonably ensure that a person under 21 years of age will not obtain alcoholic beverages; and

it is unlikely that persons under 21 years of age not employed on the premises will enter and remain on the licensed premises for purposes other than dining; and

the sale and service of food and alcoholic beverages and any other business conducted on the licensed premises of the restaurant or eating place is under the sole control of the licensee.

The board may issue a license under this section only in a municipality or established village that

has a population of 40,000 or less; and

receives more than 4,000 visitors a year, as determined by the board in regulation.

The board may issue a license or approve an application for the transfer of ownership of a license under this section if it appears that issuance or transfer will encourage the tourism trade.

The board may authorize the holder of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license

to allow a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only;

to allow a person who is under 16 years of age to enter and remain on the licensed premises for dining only if

the person is accompanied by a person who is 21 years of age or older; and

the parent or guardian of the person consents to the person being on the licensed premises; and

subject to AS

04.16.049

, to employ or permit the employment of a person who is at least 16 years of age but under 21 years of age on the licensed premises if the employer provides adequate supervision to ensure that the person does not obtain alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license shall ensure that gross receipts from the sale of food for consumption on the licensed premises are not less than the total of the gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises in each calendar year. At the time the holder submits an application for renewal of the license, the holder shall submit a statement to the board certifying that the holder has met the requirement under this subsection for the designated period of the license under AS

04.11.680

. The board may renew a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license only if the licensee provides evidence satisfactory to the board that, during the designated period of the license under AS

04.11.680

, the gross receipts from the sale of food for consumption on the licensed premises were not less than the total of the gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises.

The board shall adopt a regulation establishing a formula to limit the number of seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism licenses.

The holder of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license may provide entertainment on or adjacent to the licensed premises only between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. unless additional hours are approved by the director upon the written request of the licensee for a specific occasion. The director may not grant approval for additional hours of entertainment on or adjacent to the licensed premises of an individual licensee more than three times in a calendar year. In this subsection, “entertainment” includes dancing, karaoke, live performances, or similar activities, but does not include recorded or broadcast performances without live participation.

Except as provided under AS

04.09.620

,

04.09.640

, and AS

04.16.120(c)

, the holder of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license commits the offense of failure to comply with the terms of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license if the person sells brewed beverages or wine in violation of (a) of this section, engages in activity not authorized by the board under (f) of this section, or fails to comply with the requirements of (f), (g), or (i) of this section.

Failure to comply with the terms of a seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license is a violation.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)